Rhode Island statutes. Title 34 Property
Chapter 1 Confirmation of Legislative Grants

34-1-1.
Perpetuation of colonial acts quieting title.

The act entitled “An Act Confirming the Grants Heretofore Made by the Inhabitants of the Towns of Newport, Providence, Portsmouth, Warwick and Westerly”, passed in May, 1682, and the act entitled “An Act Quieting Possessions and Establishing Title of Land Within the Towns of Bristol, Tiverton, Little Compton, Warren and Cumberland”, passed in January, 1746, are hereby continued in force as perpetual statutes.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 204, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 255, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 299, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 441, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

34-1-1

.

34-1-2.
Confirmation of legislative conveyances generally.

Whereas, at the first settling of this state, and for sundry years afterwards, lands were of little or no value, and skillful men in the law were much wanted, whereby many deeds, grants, and conveyances were weakly made, which may occasion great contests in law if not timely prevented; therefore, all grants, charters and conveyances previously made by the general assembly unto any town, corporation, community or propriety, or to any other person or persons whomsoever, shall be and hereby are ratified and confirmed as good and effectual, to all intents and purposes in law, for conveying all such lands, tenements, hereditaments, rights, privileges and profits as are therein mentioned, to the towns, corporations, communities, proprieties, person, or persons, and to their respective successors, heirs, and assigns forever.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 205, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 256, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 300, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 438, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

34-1-2

.